Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-116.02
Licensee; violations; forfeiture or revocation of license.

Whenever any retail licensee, bottle club licensee, craft brewery licensee, or microdistillery licensee has been convicted by any court of a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, the licensee may, in addition to the penalties for such offense, incur a forfeiture of the license and all money that had been paid for the license. The local governing body may conditionally revoke the license subject to a final order of the commission, or the commission may revoke the license in an original proceeding brought before it for that purpose.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 47, p. 403;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-347;

R.S.1943, § 53-128;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 53-128;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 267, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 6.
July 19, 2018